Washington statutes.
RCW 39.67.010

Agreements contingent on property tax levy—Authorized.

Any agreement or contract between two taxing districts other than the state which is otherwise authorized by law may be made contingent upon a particular property tax levy rate of an identified taxing district other than the state where such rate affects the regular property tax rate of one of the parties to the contract and therefore affects the party's resources with which to perform under the contract. The governing body of every taxing district that could have its tax levy adversely affected by such a contract shall be notified about the contract.

[ 1988 c 274 s 2; 1986 c 107 s 1.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Severability—1988 c 274: See notes following RCW 84.52.010.

Severability—1986 c 107: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1986 c 107 s 5.]

Construction—1986 c 107 ss 1 and 2: "Sections 1 and 2 of this act are supplementary and in addition to any other authority granted by law and shall not be construed to limit any other law." [ 1986 c 107 s 6.]